dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="g/leiten__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>leiten</l>  <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eglitten</l><r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>leitend</l> <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>leite</l>   <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>leitet</l>  <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>leite</l>   <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>leitest</l> <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>leitet</l>  <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>leiten</l>  <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>leitet</l>  <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>leiten</l>  <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>litt</l>    <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>littest</l> <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>litt</l>    <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>litten</l>  <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>littet</l>  <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>litten</l>  <r>leiten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gr/aben__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>aben</l>    <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>abend</l>   <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ab</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>abt</l>     <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>abe</l>     <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äbst</l>    <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äbt</l>     <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>aben</l>    <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>abt</l>     <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>aben</l>    <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ub</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ubst</l>    <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ub</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>uben</l>    <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ubt</l>     <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>uben</l>    <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/reifen__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>reifen</l>  <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>egriffen</l><r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>reifend</l> <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>reif</l>    <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>reift</l>   <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>reife</l>   <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>reifst</l>  <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>reift</l>   <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>reifen</l>  <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>reift</l>   <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>reifen</l>  <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>riff</l>    <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>riffst</l>  <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>riff</l>    <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>riffen</l>  <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>rifft</l>   <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>riffen</l>  <r>reifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/alten__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>alten</l>   <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>altend</l>  <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>alte</l>    <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>altet</l>   <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>alte</l>    <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ältst</l>   <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ält</l>     <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>alten</l>   <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>altet</l>   <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>alten</l>   <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ielt</l>    <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieltest</l> <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ielt</l>    <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ielten</l>  <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieltet</l>  <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ielten</l>  <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="angreifen"><i>ang</i><par n="g/reifen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anhalten"><i>anh</i><par n="h/alten__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aufhalten"><i>aufh</i><par n="h/alten__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ausgleiten"><i>ausg</i><par n="g/leiten__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aushalten"><i>aush</i><par n="h/alten__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="begraben"><i>begr</i><par n="gr/aben__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="freihalten"><i>freih</i><par n="h/alten__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="graben"><i>gr</i><par n="gr/aben__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="greifen"><i>g</i><par n="g/reifen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="halten"><i>h</i><par n="h/alten__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umgraben"><i>umgr</i><par n="gr/aben__vblex"/></e>
